California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(c) All spaying or neutering deposits forfeited or unclaimed under this section shall be retained by the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group and shall be used by the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group only for the following purposes:

(1) A program to spay or neuter dogs and cats.

(2) A public education program to reduce and prevent overpopulation of dogs and cats, and the related costs to local government.

(3) A followup program to ensure that dogs and cats transferred by the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group are spayed or neutered in accordance with the agreement executed under subdivision (d) of Section 30520.

(4) Any additional costs incurred by the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group in the administration of the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 747, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative January 1, 2000, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 747.)
-------------------------------------------

30522.

(a) (1) If a recipient fails to comply with the spaying or neutering agreement within 30 business days after the agreement is signed, the recipient shall forfeit the sterilization deposit and is subject to a fine pursuant to Section 30523.

(2) An animal control officer, humane officer, police officer, peace officer, or any agency authorized to enforce the Penal Code may write citations with a civil penalty stated in an amount corresponding to the violation as provided in Section 30523. The fines shall be paid to the local municipality or public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane shelter, or rescue group. Any funds collected under this section shall be expended for the purpose of humane education, programs for low-cost spaying and neutering of dogs and cats, and any additional costs incurred by the animal shelter in the administration of the requirements of this chapter.

(3) If the owner, at any time subsequent to 30 business days after the spaying or neutering agreement was signed, provides proof of spaying or neutering, the deposit shall be forfeited, but any fine levied but not yet paid, shall be waived.

(b) A public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group may extend the date by which spaying or neutering is to be completed at its discretion for good cause shown. Any extension shall be in writing.

(c) If a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state certifies that a dog is too sick or injured to be spayed or neutered, or that it would otherwise be detrimental to the health of the dog to be spayed or neutered, the adopter or purchaser shall pay the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group a deposit of not less than forty dollars ($40), and not more than seventy-five dollars ($75). The entity shall establish the amount of the deposit at the level it determines is necessary to encourage the spaying or neutering of dogs. The deposit shall be temporary, and shall be retained only until the dog is healthy enough to be spayed or neutered as certified by a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state. The dog shall be spayed or neutered within 14 business days of that certification. The adopter or purchaser shall obtain written proof of spaying or neutering from the veterinarian performing the operation. If the adopter or purchaser presents proof of spaying or neutering to the entity from which the dog was obtained within 30 business days, the adopter or purchaser shall receive a full refund of the deposit.

(d) If an adopted dog dies within the spaying or neutering period provided for in the written agreement pursuant to Section 30520, subdivision (c) shall not apply to the dog. In that case, the recipient may receive a reimbursement of the sterilization deposit by submitting to the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group within the sterilization period a signed letter from a veterinarian licensed to practice medicine in this state stating that the animal has died. The letter shall include a description of the dog.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 747, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative January 1, 2000, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 747.)
-------------------------------------------

30523.

(a) (1) A person who commits any violation of subdivision (b) is subject to a civil penalty of not less than fifty dollars ($50) on a first violation of subdivision (b), and a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) on any second or subsequent violation of subdivision (b).

(2) An action for a penalty proposed under this section may be commenced by the administrator of the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group from which the recipient obtained the animal that is the subject of the violation in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) A person is subject to the civil penalties pursuant to subdivision (a) if that person does any of the following:

(1) Falsifies any proof of spaying or neutering submitted for the purpose of compliance with this chapter.

(2) Provides to a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group or a licensed veterinarian inaccurate information regarding ownership of any dog required to be submitted for spaying or neutering under this chapter.

(3) Submits to a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group false information regarding sterilization fees or fee schedules.

(4) Issues a check for insufficient funds for any spaying or neutering deposit required under this chapter.

(c) All penalties collected under this section shall be retained by the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group imposing the penalties, to be used solely for purposes provided for under subdivision (c) of Section 30521.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 747, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative January 1, 2000, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 747.)
-------------------------------------------

30524.

Local ordinances concerning the adoption or placement procedures of any public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group shall be at least as restrictive as this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 747, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative January 1, 2000, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 747.)
-------------------------------------------

30524.5.

(a) A public animal shelter shall not charge an adoption fee for a dog if the person adopting the dog presents to the public animal shelter a current and valid driver’s license or identification card with the word “VETERAN” printed on its face pursuant to Section 12811 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) A public animal
 shelter may limit the number of dogs adopted from that public animal shelter pursuant to this section to one dog each six-month period.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 205, Sec. 3.   (SB 245)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

30525.

Whenever a dog license tag is issued pursuant to this division, the tag shall be issued for one-half or less of the fee required for a dog, if a certificate is presented from a licensed veterinarian that the dog has been spayed or neutered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 747, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative January 1, 2000, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 747.)
-------------------------------------------

30526.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Animal shelter” means a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group.

(2) “Rescue group” means a for-profit or not-for-profit entity or a collaboration of individuals that removes dogs from a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, or humane shelter, or rehomes a dog that has been previously owned by any person other than the original breeder of that dog.

(b) If an animal shelter or rescue group knows, to the best of the knowledge of the shelter or rescue group, that a dog, at the age of four months or older, bit a person and broke that person’s skin, thus requiring a state-mandated bite quarantine, the animal shelter or rescue group shall, before selling, giving away, or otherwise releasing the dog, do both of the following:

(1) Disclose in writing to the person to whom the dog is sold, given away, or transferred, the dog’s known bite history and the circumstances related to the bite.

(2) Obtain a signed acknowledgment from the person to whom the dog is sold, given away, or transferred that the person has been provided information about the dog as required by this section. The animal shelter or rescue group shall provide
 the person with a copy of the signed acknowledgment and retain the original copy in its files.

(c) These documentation and disclosure requirements are for the purpose of public safety and the appropriate placement of dogs. A documented bite history does not necessarily preclude a dog from being available for adoption, release, or transfer, notwithstanding any other law or local ordinance related to biting dogs.

(d) Notwithstanding Sections 31401 and 31402, any violation of this section shall be punished by a civil fine not to exceed five hundred dollars
 ($500), imposed by the city or county in which the animal shelter or rescue group is located. If the person who violates this section is a society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group, the proceeds of the civil fine shall be paid to the local public animal control agency or shelter. If a public animal control agency or shelter violates this section, the proceeds of the civil fine shall be deposited into the treasury of the city or county in which the public animal control agency or shelter is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 430, Sec. 2.   (AB 588)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Disposition of Funds [30651. - 30656.]

30651.

As used in this chapter, “livestock” includes domestic fowls and rabbits.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

30652.

All fees for the issuance of dog license tags and all fines collected pursuant to this division shall be paid into the county, city, or city and county treasury, as the case may be, and shall be used as follows:

(a) First, to pay fees for the issuance of dog license tags.

(b) Second, to pay fees, salaries, costs, expenses, or any or all of them for the enforcement of this division and all ordinances that are made pursuant to this division.

(c) Third, to pay damages to owners of livestock that are killed by dogs.

(d) Fourth, to pay costs of any
 hospitalization or emergency care of animals pursuant to Section 597.1 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 256, Sec. 3.   (SB 781)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

30653.

Each such claim for damages is governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940), Division 3.6, Title 1 of the Government Code, except that the claim, as presented, shall be accompanied by the affidavits of two disinterested witnesses executed within four days after the finding of the carcass of the animal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

30654.

The affidavits shall fix the value of the livestock and establish the fact beyond reasonable doubt that the animal was killed by a dog.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

30655.

If a claim is allowed, it shall be paid from the fund which is provided for in this chapter in the same manner as other claims against the county are paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

30656.

(a) Any county, city, or city and county may, by ordinance, elect to utilize the provisions of this section in lieu of Sections 30653 and 30654.

(b) The claim for damages to livestock, in addition to being governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code, shall be accompanied by a statement by the local animal control officer relating to the probable cause of death of the animal and by proof submitted by the owner of the livestock to establish the value of the animal.

(c) The statement submitted by the local animal control officer shall set forth the facts upon which the officer’s statement is based and shall indicate whether, to the best of the officer’s knowledge, the animal was killed by a dog.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 108, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Dog Tags [30801. - 30807.]

30801.

(a) A board of supervisors may provide for the issuance of serially numbered metallic dog licenses pursuant to this section. The dog licenses shall be stamped with the name of the county and the year of issue.

(b) The board of supervisors or animal control department may authorize veterinarians to issue the licenses to owners of dogs who apply.

(c) The licenses shall be issued for a period of not to exceed two years.

(d) In addition to the authority provided in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), a license may be issued, as provided by this section, by a board of supervisors for a period not to exceed
 three years for dogs that have attained the age of 12 months, or older, and who have been vaccinated against rabies. The person to whom the license is to be issued pursuant to this subdivision may choose a license period as established by the board of supervisors of up to one, two, or three years. However, when issuing a license pursuant to this subdivision, the license period shall not extend beyond the remaining period of validity for the current rabies vaccination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 52.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

30802.

Each application for a dog license tag shall state the age, sex, color, and breed of the dog for which the license is desired and the address of the owner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

30803.

(a) The animal control department shall endorse upon the application for a dog license tag the number of the license tag issued.

(b) All applications that have been endorsed shall be kept on file in the office of the animal control department open to public inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 118, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30804.

The fee for the issuance of the dog license tag is fifty cents ($0.50). The board of supervisors may, however, increase the fee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

30804.5.

Whenever dog license tags are issued pursuant to this division, any such tag shall be issued for one-half or less of the fee required for a dog, if a certificate is presented from a licensed veterinarian that the dog has been spayed or neutered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 361.)
-------------------------------------------

30804.7.

(a) The owner of a nonspayed or unneutered dog that is impounded once by a city or county animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, or humane society, shall be fined thirty-five dollars ($35) on the first occurrence, fifty dollars ($50) on the second occurrence, and one hundred dollars ($100) for the third or subsequent occurrence. These fines are for unneutered impounded animals only, and are not in lieu of any fines or impound fees imposed by any individual city, county, public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, or humane society shelter.

(b) An animal control officer, humane officer, police officer, peace officer, or any agency authorized to enforce the Penal Code may write citations with a civil penalty stated in an amount corresponding to the violation as provided in subdivision (a). The fines shall be paid to the local municipality or public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, or humane society shelter. Any funds collected under this section shall be expended for the purpose of humane education, programs for low cost spaying and neutering of dogs, and any additional costs incurred by the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group in the administration of the requirements of this division.

(c) This section applies to each county and cities within each county, regardless of population.

(d) No city or county, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, or humane society is subject to any civil action by the owner of a dog that is spayed or neutered in accordance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 253, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30805.

The board of supervisors shall fix the compensation of the animal control department for issuing dog license tags.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 118, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30807.

Any licensed kennel may be exempted pursuant to regulation or ordinance from any requirement to obtain a license tag for each dog within the kennel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 361.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.5. Guide Dogs, Signal Dogs,and Service Dogs [30850. - 30854.]

30850.

(a) The animal control department shall endorse upon the application for an assistance dog identification tag the number of the identification tag issued. As used in this chapter, “assistance dogs” are dogs specially trained as guide dogs, signal dogs, or service dogs. All applications that have been endorsed shall be kept on file in the office of the animal control department and shall be open to public inspection.

(b) Whenever a person applies for an assistance dog identification tag, the person shall sign an affidavit stating as follows:

“By affixing my signature to this affidavit, I hereby declare I fully understand that Section 365.7 of the Penal Code prohibits any person to knowingly and fraudulently represent himself or herself, through verbal or written notice, to be the owner or trainer of any canine licensed as, to be qualified as, or identified as, a guide dog, signal dog, or service dog, as defined in subdivisions (d), (e), and (f), respectively, of Section 365.5 of the Penal Code and paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 54.1 of the Civil Code, and that a violation of Section 365.7 of the Penal Code is a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.”

(c) Upon the death or retirement of an assistance dog, the owner or person in possession of the assistance dog identification tag shall immediately return the tag to the animal control department that issued the tag.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 118, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30851.

The owners of assistance dogs shall comply with all state and local ordinances regarding health and licensure requirements for dogs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1257, Sec. 10.5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

30852.

(a) The tag identifying a dog as an assistance dog shall be used only by a person with a disability or a trainer of an assistance dog and shall be of such uniform statewide shape, size, and color as to be easily recognized.

(b) The Department of Food and Agriculture, in consultation with the State Department of Health Services, shall specify the shape, size, and color of the tags. This subdivision shall not be subject to the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 498, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

30853.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the access of any person in violation of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 498, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

30854.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid or to be in conflict with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336), that invalidity or conflict shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid or conflicting provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 498, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Regulation [30951. - 30956.]

30951.

It is unlawful for any person to own, harbor, or keep any dog over the age of four months, or to permit such a dog which is owned, harbored, or controlled by him to run at large, unless the dog has attached to its neck or leg a substantial collar on which one of the following is fastened:

(a) A metallic tag which gives the name and post office address of the owner. 

(b) A metal license tag which is issued by the authority of a county, city and county, or any municipal corporation for the purpose of identifying the dog and designating the owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 583.)
-------------------------------------------

30952.

It is unlawful for any person to attach a license tag to the collar of any dog except the dog which is described in the application for such license tag.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

30953.

Except as otherwise provided in this division, it is unlawful for any person to kill, injure, or impound any dog, if the owner of the dog has complied with the provisions of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

30954.

It is unlawful for any person to permit any female dog which is owned, harbored, or controlled by him, to run at large at any time during the period when the dog is in heat or breeding condition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

30955.

It is unlawful for any person to permit any dog which is owned, harbored, or controlled by him to run at large on any farm on which livestock or domestic fowls are kept, without the consent of the owner of the farm, except for herding livestock, hunting or sporting purposes, or any competitive trials when the dog is within reasonable control or call of his owner or the agent of his owner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

30956.

In an action for violation of Section 30955, the court may stay imposition of a sentence and order the defendant to compensate the owner of the farm in an amount equal to the cost of the damage done by the defendant’s dog. If the defendant refuses to compensate the owner under this section, the court shall impose the appropriate sentence.

Acceptance by the owner of compensation under this section precludes that person from bringing an action under any other law for damages caused by the defendant’s dog.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 457, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.5. Importation of Dogs [31000. - 31002.]

31000.

(a) A person selling, transporting, or importing a dog into the state for the purpose of resale or change of ownership shall obtain, and submit to the department and the buyer, a health certificate for the dog that has been completed by a licensed veterinarian and is dated no more than 10 days before the date on which the dog is brought into the state.

(b) The health certificate shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) The date of the examination.

(2) A statement that the examination revealed no clinical evidence
 of infectious or communicable disease, including external parasites and fungi, and that, to the best of the licensed veterinarian’s knowledge, the dog has not recently been exposed to such infectious or communicable disease.

(3) Any vaccinations, treatments, or tests, and the results of such administered to the dog.

(4) (A) A statement that the dog has been properly immunized against rabies by a vaccine approved by the United States Department of Agriculture within 12 months before the date of importation into the State of California.

(B) This immunization requirement shall not apply if the dog is under three
 months old or if a licensed veterinarian certifies in writing that because of old age, or another reason, the life of the dog would be endangered by the administration of the rabies vaccine.

(5) The number of dogs in the shipment.

(6) A description of each dog in the shipment, including breed, age, and sex.

(7) If microchipped, the microchip number for each dog in the shipment.

(8) The physical address for both the origin and destination of the dog in the shipment. A post office box, airport, parking lot, or other public or nonfixed location shall not be used
 as the physical address. The physical address shall correspond to a verifiable, permanent residence or business location where the animal resides or is housed.

(9) The signature, printed name, physical address, and state license number of the licensed veterinarian who examined the dogs in the shipment.

(10) The full name, physical address, email address, and telephone number of the consignor and the full name, physical address, email address, and telephone number of the buyer.

(11) The United States Department of Agriculture license number
 associated with the breeder of the dog, if applicable.

(c) Completion of a United States Department of Agriculture Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service Form 7001, known as the United States Interstate and International Certificate of Health Examination for Small Animals, may be used to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a) if the minimum requirements described in subdivision (b) are satisfied by the form. A different form of health certificate acceptable to the department may also be used to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a) if the minimum requirements described in subdivision (b) are satisfied by the form.

(d) The person selling, transporting, or importing the dog into this state for the purpose of resale or change of ownership shall submit the health certificate to the department and the buyer via an electronic transmission.

(e) For purposes of this section, “consignor” means a person, business, or organization that ships or sends goods to another party for sale or storage, retaining ownership until the goods are paid for.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 480, Sec. 1.   (SB 312)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

31002.

(a) A health certificate received by the department pursuant to this chapter is a public record subject to disclosure, without redaction, under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(b) The department shall make the health certificates it receives pursuant to this chapter available upon request and without requiring a person to submit a request under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). 

(c) The department shall retain a health certificate for five years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 480, Sec. 1.   (SB 312)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Killing and Seizure [31101. - 31153.]



  ARTICLE 1. Generally [31101. - 31109.]

31101.

Any dog which is found running at large without the identification tag or dog license tag which is required pursuant to Section 30951 may be seized and impounded by any peace officer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

31102.

Except in an area in which the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 31151) of this chapter apply or as otherwise provided in Section 31104, any person may kill any dog in any of the following cases:

(a) The dog is found in the act of killing, wounding, or persistently pursuing or worrying livestock or poultry on land or premises which are not owned or possessed by the owner of the dog.

(b) The person has such proof as conclusively shows that the dog has been recently engaged in killing or wounding livestock or poultry on land or premises which are not owned or possessed by the dog’s owner.

No action, civil or criminal, shall be maintained for the killing of any such dog.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

31103.

Except in an area in which the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 31151) of this chapter apply or as otherwise provided in Section 31104, any dog entering any enclosed or unenclosed property upon which livestock or poultry are confined may be seized or killed by the owner or tenant of the property or by any employee of the owner or tenant. No action, civil or criminal, shall be maintained against the owner, tenant, or employee for the seizure or killing of any such dog.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

31104.

The provisions of Sections 31102 and 31103 shall not apply to any dog which is inside the corporate limits of any city, or city and county, or to any dog which is under the reasonable control of his owner or keeper, unless the dog is actually caught in the act or worrying, wounding, chasing, or killing any livestock or poultry.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

31105.

The board of supervisors shall provide for both of the following:

(a) The taking up and impounding of all dogs which are found running at large in violation of any provision of this division.

(b) The killing in some humane manner or other disposition of any dog which is impounded.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

31106.

The board of supervisors may appoint proper persons to take up, impound, and kill dogs pursuant to this division or it may enter into a contract with any humane society or other organization or association which will do both of the following:

(a) Undertake to carry out the provisions of this division regarding the taking up, impounding, and killing of dogs.

(b) Give a proper bond in whatever amount may be fixed by the board of supervisors for the faithful performance of the contract.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

31107.

No dog which is impounded pursuant to this division shall be killed or otherwise disposed of without notice to the owner, if he is known.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

31108.

(a) (1) The required holding period for a stray dog impounded pursuant to this division shall be six business days, not including the day of impoundment, except as follows:

(A) If the public or private shelter has made the dog available for owner redemption on one weekday evening until at least 7 p.m. or one weekend day, the holding period shall be four business days, not including the day of impoundment.

(B) If the public or private shelter has fewer than three full-time employees or is not open during all regular weekday business hours, and if it has established a procedure to enable owners to reclaim their dogs by appointment at a mutually agreeable time when the public or
 private shelter would otherwise be closed, the holding period shall be four business days, not including the day of impoundment.

(2) Except as provided in Section 17006, stray dogs shall be held for owner redemption during the first three days of the holding period, not including the day of impoundment, and shall be available for owner redemption or adoption for the remainder of the holding period.

(b) (1) Except as provided in Section 17006, a stray dog that is impounded pursuant to this division shall, before the euthanasia of that animal, be released to a nonprofit, as defined in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, animal rescue, or adoption organization if requested by the organization before the scheduled euthanasia of that animal. The public or private shelter may enter into cooperative agreements with an animal rescue or adoption
 organization. In addition to a required spay or neuter deposit, the public or private shelter, at its discretion, may assess a fee, not to exceed the standard adoption fee, for animals adopted or released.

(2) A puppy under eight weeks of age that is reasonably believed to be unowned and is impounded in a public or private shelter may, before the euthanasia of that animal, be made immediately available for release to a nonprofit, as defined in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, animal rescue, or adoption organization if requested by the organization.

(c) During the holding period required by this section and before the adoption or euthanasia of a dog impounded pursuant to this division, a public or private shelter shall scan the dog for a microchip that identifies the owner of that dog and shall make reasonable efforts to contact the owner and notify the owner that
 the owner’s dog is impounded and is available for redemption.

(d) As used in this division, a “business day” includes any day that a public or private shelter is open to the public for at least four hours, excluding state holidays.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 1988)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

31108.3.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group shall not release a dog to an owner seeking to reclaim it, or adopt out, sell, or give away a dog to a new owner, unless either of the following conditions is met:

(A) The dog is microchipped with current information on the owner reclaiming the dog or new owner receiving the dog, as applicable, and the owner or new owner is registered with the microchip registry company as the primary owner of the dog. The public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of
 cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group shall not be registered with a microchip registry company as the primary owner of the dog. Upon adoption, sale, giving away, or transfer of ownership, the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group shall provide information on the transference of ownership, including microchip company information, the microchip number and any other relevant identifiers, and any other information needed for an owner or new owner to register themselves as the microchip’s primary contact, as applicable.

(B) If the agency, shelter, or group does not have microchipping capability on location, the agency, shelter, or group first obtains from the owner reclaiming the dog or new owner receiving the dog
 an agreement that requires the owner or new owner to present to the agency, shelter, or group, within the next 30 days, proof that the dog is microchipped as described in subparagraph (A).

(2) If the agency, shelter, or group does not have microchipping capability on location, the agency, shelter, or group shall make a good faith effort to maintain a list of local and regional free or discounted regional microchipping services and provide that information to the owner or new owner.

(3) An agency, shelter, or group may require proof that the dog is microchipped pursuant to paragraph (1) before releasing, adopting out, selling, or giving away the dog. If a dog has a preexisting microchip or there is reasonable proof of ownership, the agency, shelter, or group shall document and retain
 a record of all efforts made to contact the microchip’s primary registrant or other demonstrated owner for at least two years.

(4) For purposes of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), an owner reclaiming a dog or new owner receiving a dog is not required to register the dog’s microchip number with a microchip registry company that will use, without the owner’s or new owner’s consent, the personal information of the owner or new owner for purposes other than to reunite the owner or new owner with the dog.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section does not require a dog to be microchipped if a licensed veterinarian certifies in writing that the dog is medically unfit for the microchipping procedure because the dog has a physical condition that
 would be substantially aggravated by the procedure.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section does not require a dog to be microchipped if the agency, shelter, or group receives a signed form from the owner reclaiming the dog or new owner receiving the dog that states that the cost of microchipping would impose an economic hardship for the owner or new owner.

(c) (1) An agency, shelter, or group that violates this section on or after January 1, 2022, is subject to a civil penalty of one hundred dollars ($100).

(2) Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 31401) and Section 9 do not apply to a violation of this section.

(3) An agency, shelter,
 or group that does not have microchipping capability on location is not subject to the civil penalty described in this subdivision upon obtaining the agreement described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(d) This section does not apply to a dog that is temporarily housed under an emergency evacuation order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 549, Sec. 1.   (AB 2723)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31108.5.

(a) (1) Upon relinquishment of a dog to a public or private shelter, the owner of that dog shall present sufficient identification to establish his or her ownership of the dog and shall sign a statement that he or she is the lawful owner of the dog.
